Maryland, session 2026, SB0208.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
10–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Commission” means the Maryland Higher Education Commission.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0208*

SENATE BILL 208
11–202.1.
(b) (1) Subject to the requirements imposed by this section, and except as
prohibited in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a religious educational institution may
operate without a certificate of approval from the Commission and may enroll Maryland
students in a fully online distance education program in the State without a registration
from the Commission if the institution:
(i) Is established for religious educational purposes;
(ii) Provides educational programs only for religious vocations or
purposes;
(iii) Offers only sectarian instruction designed for and aimed at
individuals who hold or seek to learn the particular religious faiths or beliefs taught by the
institution; and
(iv) States on the certificate or diploma the religious nature of the
award.
(2) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH DOES NOT APPLY TO A RELIGIOUS
EDUCATIONAL INSTITUTION THAT WAS AUTHORIZED TO OPERATE IN THE STATE
AND HAS BEEN IN CONTINUOUS OPERATION IN THE STATE SINCE BEFORE JANUARY
1, 2013.
(II) A religious educational institution that is accredited by an
accrediting body recognized by the United States Department of Education may not operate
without a certificate of approval from the Commission.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.